Texas, session 892, HB303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  (a)  The Commission on Jail Standards shall conduct a study to evaluate the living conditions and safety of persons confined in the Harris County jail. (b)  Not later than December 1, 2026, the Commission on Jail Standards shall submit to the legislature a written report on the results of the study and any recommendations for legislative or other action to improve the living conditions and safety of persons confined in the Harris County jail. SECTION 2.  This Act expires September 1, 2027. SECTION 3.  This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.